Hawaii statutes.
§329-74 Unlawful transport of
pseudoephedrine. (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful transport
of pseudoephedrine if the person transports more than three packages of any
product the sale of which is restricted by section 329‑75.

(b) For purposes of this section,
"transportation" means the transfer of a pseudoephedrine product by a
person other than a wholesaler, distributor, or retailer of such product
authorized to conduct business as such by the State.

(c) Unlawful transport of pseudoephedrine is a
misdemeanor. [L 2005, c 193, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 218, §15]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next